Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-2925
Revenue bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness; authorized.

The investment program is authorized to issue revenue bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness for the purposes of financing, refinancing, or refunding loans and other eligible costs under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act. Obligations may be issued in any amount and at any time as approved by the commission to meet the funding needs of any approved project. The issuance of bonds under the Infrastructure Development Investment Program Act is separate and distinct from any authority or limitation to issue bonds under the Nebraska Highway Bond Act.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 25.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Highway Bond Act, see section 39-2222.